Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.315

Immigration enforcement model policies—Adoption by law enforcement agencies.

To ensure state and law enforcement agencies are able to foster the community trust necessary to maintain public safety, within twelve months of May 21, 2019, the attorney general must, in consultation with appropriate stakeholders, publish model policies, guidance, and training recommendations consistent with chapter 440, Laws of 2019 and state and local law, aimed at ensuring that state and local law enforcement duties are carried out in a manner that limits, to the fullest extent practicable and consistent with federal and state law, engagement with federal immigration authorities for the purpose of immigration enforcement. All state and local law enforcement agencies must either:

(1) Adopt policies consistent with that guidance; or

(2) Notify the attorney general that the agency is not adopting the guidance and model policies, state the reasons that the agency is not adopting the model policies and guidance, and provide the attorney general with a copy of the agency's policies to ensure compliance with chapter 440, Laws of 2019.

[ 2019 c 440 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2019 c 440: See notes following RCW 43.17.425.